District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.11

Appointment and supervision of prison personnel.

The superintendents and all other employees engaged on March 16, 1926, in the operation of the Workhouse at Occoquan in the State of Virginia, the Reformatory at Lorton in the State of Virginia, and the Washington Asylum and Jail shall after March 16, 1926, be subject to the supervision of the Department of Corrections. Each superintendent shall have the management and control of the institution to which he is appointed and shall be subordinate to the Director of the Department of Corrections. The superintendent and all other employees of each of the institutions enumerated in this section shall be appointed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia upon nomination by the Department of Corrections and shall be subject to discharge by the Mayor upon recommendation of the Department of Corrections.

History

Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-411.
1973 Ed., § 24-411.

References in Text

“Department of Corrections” was substituted for “Board of Public Welfare” pursuant to § 24-211.03.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.